Nebraska, session 109, LB253.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB253 LB253
2025 2025
Section 1. For purposes of sections 1 to 3 of this act:
(1) Biomarker means a characteristic that is objectively measured
and evaluated as an indicator of normal biological processes, pathogenic
processes, or pharmacologic responses to a specific therapeutic
intervention, including known gene-drug interactions for medications
being considered for use or already being administered. Biomarkers
include, but are not limited to, gene mutations, characteristics of
genes, or protein expression;
(2) Biomarker testing means the analysis of tissue, blood, or other
biospecimen for the presence of a biomarker. Biomarker testing includes,
but is not limited to, single-analyte tests, multi-plex panel tests,
protein expression, and whole exome, whole genome, and whole
transcriptome sequencing;
(3) Consensus statements means statements developed by an
independent, multidisciplinary panel of experts utilizing a transparent
methodology and reporting structure and with a conflict of interest
policy. These statements are aimed at specific clinical circumstances and
based on the best available evidence for the purpose of optimizing the
outcomes of clinical care; and
(4) Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines means
evidence-based clinical practice guidelines developed by independent
organizations or medical professional societies utilizing a transparent
methodology and reporting structure and with a conflict of interest
policy. Clinical practice guidelines establish standards of care informed
by a systematic review of evidence and an assessment of the benefits and
risks of alternative care options and include recommendations intended to
optimize patient care.
Sec. 2. (1) Health insurers, nonprofit health service plans, and
health maintenance organizations issuing, amending, delivering, or
renewing a health insurance contract on or after January 1, 2026, shall
include coverage for biomarker testing pursuant to criteria established
-2-

LB253 LB253
2025 2025
under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) Biomarker testing shall be covered for the purposes of
diagnosis, treatment, appropriate management, or ongoing monitoring of a
disease or condition when the test is supported by medical and scientific
evidence, including, but not limited to:
(a) Labeled indications for a test approved or cleared by the
federal Food and Drug Administration;
(b) Indicated tests for a drug approved by the federal Food and Drug
Administration;
(c) Warnings and precautions on drug labels approved by the federal
Food and Drug Administration;
(d) National coverage determinations by the federal Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services or local coverage determinations by the
medicare administrative contractor; or
(e) Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines and consensus
statements.
(3) Health insurers, nonprofit health service plans, and health
maintenance organizations shall ensure that coverage, as specified in
subsection (2) of this section, is provided in a manner that limits
disruptions in care, including the need for multiple biopsies or
biospecimen samples.
(4) If prior authorization is required, the health insurer,
nonprofit health service plan, health maintenance organization, prior
authorization entity, or any third party acting on behalf of an
organization or entity subject to this section shall approve or deny a
prior authorization request and notify the patient, the patient's health
care provider, and any entity requesting authorization of the service
within seventy-two hours for nonurgent requests or within twenty-four
hours for urgent requests.
(5) The patient and prescribing practitioner shall have access to a
clear, readily accessible, and convenient process to request an exception
-3-

LB253 LB253
2025 2025
to a coverage policy or an adverse prior authorization determination. The
process shall be made readily accessible on the health insurer's,
nonprofit health service plan's, or health maintenance organization's
website.
Sec. 3. (1) The medical assistance program shall cover biomarker
testing no later than January 1, 2026.
(2) Biomarker testing shall be covered for the purposes of
diagnosis, treatment, appropriate management, or ongoing monitoring of a
disease or condition when the test is supported by medical and scientific
evidence, including, but not limited to:
(a) Labeled indications for a test approved or cleared by the
federal Food and Drug Administration;
(b) Indicated tests for a drug approved by the federal Food and Drug
Administration;
(c) Warnings and precautions on drug labels approved by the federal
Food and Drug Administration;
(d) National coverage determinations by the federal Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services or local coverage determinations by the
medicare administrative contractor; or
(e) Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines and consensus
statements.
(3) Entities contracting with the medical assistance program to
deliver services to program recipients shall provide biomarker testing at
the same scope, duration, and frequency as the medical assistance program
otherwise provides to recipients.
(4) If prior authorization is required, the medical assistance
program or any third party acting on behalf of the medical assistance
program shall approve or deny a prior authorization request and notify
the recipient, the recipient's health care provider, and any entity
requesting authorization of the service within seventy-two hours for
nonurgent requests or within twenty-four hours for urgent requests.
-4-

LB253 LB253
2025 2025
(5) The recipient and participating medical assistance program
provider shall have access to a clear, readily accessible, and convenient
process to request an exception to a coverage policy of the medical
assistance program or an adverse prior authorization determination. The
process shall be made readily accessible on the Department of Health and
Human Services' website.
-5-